Utah statutes.
61-1-18.3.   Information obtained by division or commission -- Use for personal benefit prohibited -- Disclosure.

(1)  It is unlawful for an employee of the division or a member of the commission to use for personal benefit any non-public information that is filed with or obtained by the division or commission.

(2)  This chapter does not authorize the division, an employee of the division, the commission, or a member of the commission to disclose information described in Subsection (1), except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this chapter.

(3)  No provision of this chapter either creates or derogates from a privilege that exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under subpoena directed to:

(a)  the division;

(b)  the commission;

(c)  a member of the commission; or

(d)  an employee of the division.

